packages/hunspell-reader/dictionaries/eu/eu.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY hzsxaertkniouldgjbmpGCqFfDNBUPRAHOvWcEVyMLISQTKwJXñZY.

REP 36
REP z s
REP z x
REP s z
REP s x
REP x s
REP x z
REP z tz
REP x tx
REP s ts
REP tz z
REP tx x
REP ts s
REP 0 h
REP h 0
REP u o
REP o u
REP b p
REP d t
REP g k
REP p b
REP t d
REP k g
REP x j
REP j x
REP j g
REP g j
REP ll il
REP il ll
REP in ñ
REP ñ in
REP mb nb
REP mp np
REP nm mm
REP v b
REP t 0
REP ikan ik

NOSPLITSUGS

WORDCHARS .-

BREAK 1
BREAK -

FLAG num

NEEDAFFIX 1

PFX 1000 Y 1
PFX 1000 0 ba .
PFX 1001 Y 5
PFX 1001 d bait d
PFX 1001 g baik g
PFX 1001 0 bai n
PFX 1001 0 bai l
PFX 1001 0 bait [^dgnl]
PFX 1002 Y 3
PFX 1002 h berr h
PFX 1002 0 berr [aeiou]
PFX 1002 0 bir [^haeiou]
SFX 344 Y 66
SFX 344 0 0 .
SFX 344 0 ño .
SFX 344 0 ño/1,387 .
SFX 344 0 a .
SFX 344 0 ago .
SFX 344 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 344 0 ak .
SFX 344 0 an .
SFX 344 0 arekin .
SFX 344 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 aren .
SFX 344 0 arendako .
SFX 344 0 arentzat .
SFX 344 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 344 0 ari .
SFX 344 0 az .
SFX 344 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 344 0 dun .
SFX 344 0 dun/1,373 .
SFX 344 0 ei .
SFX 344 0 ek .
SFX 344 0 ekin .
SFX 344 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 en .
SFX 344 0 endako .
SFX 344 0 entzat .
SFX 344 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 344 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 344 0 ez .
SFX 344 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 344 0 gatik .
SFX 344 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 gile .
SFX 344 0 gile/1,362 .
SFX 344 0 i .
SFX 344 0 ik .
SFX 344 0 ka .
SFX 344 0 ka/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 oi .
SFX 344 0 ok .
SFX 344 0 okin .
SFX 344 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 on .
SFX 344 0 ontzat .
SFX 344 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 344 0 otaz .
SFX 344 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 344 0 oz .
SFX 344 0 pe .
SFX 344 0 pe/1,379 .
SFX 344 0 ra .
SFX 344 0 raino .
SFX 344 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 rantz .
SFX 344 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 344 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 344 0 rat .
SFX 344 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 344 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 344 0 tsu .
SFX 344 0 tsu/1,361 .
SFX 344 0 z .
SFX 344 0 z/1,370 .
SFX 345 Y 16
SFX 345 0 k .
SFX 345 0 ko .
SFX 345 0 koa .
SFX 345 0 koak .
SFX 345 0 koa/1,372 .
SFX 345 0 ko/1,388 .
SFX 345 0 ta/1,375 .
SFX 345 0 tik .
SFX 345 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 345 0 txo .
SFX 345 0 txo/1,387 .
SFX 345 0 tzar .
SFX 345 0 tzarr/1,389 .
SFX 345 0 tzar/1,385 .
SFX 345 0 tzat .
SFX 345 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 346 Y 76
SFX 346 0 0 .
SFX 346 0 a .
SFX 346 0 ago .
SFX 346 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 346 0 ak .
SFX 346 0 an .
SFX 346 0 arekin .
SFX 346 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 aren .
SFX 346 0 arendako .
SFX 346 0 arentzat .
SFX 346 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 346 0 ari .
SFX 346 0 az .
SFX 346 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 346 0 dun .
SFX 346 0 dun/1,373 .
SFX 346 0 ean .
SFX 346 0 egi .
SFX 346 0 egi/1,362 .
SFX 346 0 ei .
SFX 346 0 ek .
SFX 346 0 ekin .
SFX 346 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 eko .
SFX 346 0 eko/1,378 .
SFX 346 0 en .
SFX 346 0 endako .
SFX 346 0 entzat .
SFX 346 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 en/1,374 .
SFX 346 0 era .
SFX 346 0 eraino .
SFX 346 0 eraino/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 erantz .
SFX 346 0 erantz/1,380 .
SFX 346 0 eranz/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 erat .
SFX 346 0 era/1,381 .
SFX 346 0 er/1,383 .
SFX 346 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 346 0 etik .
SFX 346 0 eti/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 ez .
SFX 346 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 346 0 gatik .
SFX 346 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 i .
SFX 346 0 ik .
SFX 346 0 ki .
SFX 346 0 ki/1,376 .
SFX 346 0 oi .
SFX 346 0 ok .
SFX 346 0 okin .
SFX 346 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 on .
SFX 346 0 ontzat .
SFX 346 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 346 0 otaz .
SFX 346 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 346 0 oz .
SFX 346 0 pe .
SFX 346 0 pe/1,379 .
SFX 346 0 tasun .
SFX 346 0 tasun/1,363 .
SFX 346 0 txo .
SFX 346 0 txo/1,369 .
SFX 346 0 tzar .
SFX 346 0 tzarr/1,384 .
SFX 346 0 tzar/1,385 .
SFX 346 0 tzat .
SFX 346 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 346 0 xe/1,386 .
SFX 347 Y 7
SFX 347 0 0 .
SFX 347 0 ela .
SFX 347 0 ela/1,370 .
SFX 347 0 en .
SFX 347 0 enean .
SFX 347 0 enerako .
SFX 347 0 en/1,412 .
SFX 340 Y 25
SFX 340 0 0 .
SFX 340 0 ago .
SFX 340 0 ago/1,390 .
SFX 340 0 egi .
SFX 340 0 egi/1,390 .
SFX 340 0 en .
SFX 340 0 en/1,391 .
SFX 340 0 gatik .
SFX 340 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 340 0 k .
SFX 340 0 rekin .
SFX 340 0 reki/1,370 .
SFX 340 0 ren .
SFX 340 0 rendako .
SFX 340 0 rentzat .
SFX 340 0 rentza/1,370 .
SFX 340 0 ren/1,371 .
SFX 340 0 re/1,382 .
SFX 340 0 ri .
SFX 340 0 rik .
SFX 340 0 ta/1,375 .
SFX 340 0 tzat .
SFX 340 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 340 0 z .
SFX 340 0 z/1,370 .
SFX 341 Y 85
SFX 341 0 0 .
SFX 341 0 ño .
SFX 341 0 ño/1,369 .
SFX 341 0 a .
SFX 341 0 ago .
SFX 341 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 341 0 ak .
SFX 341 0 araz .
SFX 341 0 araz/1,364 .
SFX 341 0 arekin .
SFX 341 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 aren .
SFX 341 0 arendako .
SFX 341 0 arentzat .
SFX 341 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 341 0 ari .
SFX 341 0 az .
SFX 341 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 341 0 da .
SFX 341 0 da/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 dun .
SFX 341 0 dun/1,373 .
SFX 341 0 ean .
SFX 341 0 egi .
SFX 341 0 egi/1,362 .
SFX 341 0 ei .
SFX 341 0 ek .
SFX 341 0 ekin .
SFX 341 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 eko .
SFX 341 0 eko/1,378 .
SFX 341 0 en .
SFX 341 0 endako .
SFX 341 0 entzat .
SFX 341 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 en/1,374 .
SFX 341 0 era .
SFX 341 0 eraino .
SFX 341 0 eraino/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 erantz .
SFX 341 0 erantz/1,380 .
SFX 341 0 eranz/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 erat .
SFX 341 0 era/1,381 .
SFX 341 0 er/1,383 .
SFX 341 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 341 0 etik .
SFX 341 0 eti/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 ez .
SFX 341 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 341 0 garri .
SFX 341 0 garri/1,361 .
SFX 341 0 gatik .
SFX 341 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 go .
SFX 341 0 i .
SFX 341 0 ik .
SFX 341 0 i/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 ki .
SFX 341 0 ki/1,376 .
SFX 341 0 oi .
SFX 341 0 ok .
SFX 341 0 okin .
SFX 341 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 on .
SFX 341 0 ontzat .
SFX 341 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 341 0 otaz .
SFX 341 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 341 0 oz .
SFX 341 0 tasun .
SFX 341 0 tasun/1,363 .
SFX 341 0 txo .
SFX 341 0 txo/1,369 .
SFX 341 0 tzaile .
SFX 341 0 tzaile/1,366 .
SFX 341 0 tzar .
SFX 341 0 tzarr/1,384 .
SFX 341 0 tzar/1,385 .
SFX 341 0 tzat .
SFX 341 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 341 0 xe/1,386 .
SFX 342 Y 27
SFX 342 0 0 .
SFX 342 0 dura .
SFX 342 0 dura/1,359 .
SFX 342 0 dur/1,360 .
SFX 342 0 garri .
SFX 342 0 garri/1,361 .
SFX 342 0 keran .
SFX 342 0 men .
SFX 342 0 mendu .
SFX 342 0 mendu/1,362 .
SFX 342 0 men/1,363 .
SFX 342 0 pe .
SFX 342 0 pen .
SFX 342 0 pen/1,363 .
SFX 342 0 pe/1,379 .
SFX 342 0 raz .
SFX 342 0 raz/1,364 .
SFX 342 0 tu .
SFX 342 0 tu/1,365 .
SFX 342 0 tzaile .
SFX 342 0 tzaile/1,366 .
SFX 342 0 tze .
SFX 342 0 tzear .
SFX 342 0 tzeke .
SFX 342 0 tzen .
SFX 342 0 tzen/1,367 .
SFX 342 0 tze/1,368 .
SFX 343 Y 19
SFX 343 0 0 .
SFX 343 0 garri .
SFX 343 0 garri/1,361 .
SFX 343 0 men .
SFX 343 0 mendu .
SFX 343 0 mendu/1,362 .
SFX 343 0 men/1,363 .
SFX 343 0 pen .
SFX 343 0 pen/1,363 .
SFX 343 0 taraz .
SFX 343 0 taraz/1,364 .
SFX 343 0 tu .
SFX 343 0 tu/1,365 .
SFX 343 0 tze .
SFX 343 0 tzear .
SFX 343 0 tzeke .
SFX 343 0 tzen .
SFX 343 0 tzen/1,367 .
SFX 343 0 tze/1,368 .
SFX 348 Y 13
SFX 348 0 0 .
SFX 348 0 ek .
SFX 348 0 ekin .
SFX 348 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 348 0 en .
SFX 348 0 endako .
SFX 348 0 entzat .
SFX 348 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 348 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 348 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 348 0 ez .
SFX 348 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 348 0 i .
SFX 349 Y 34
SFX 349 0 0 .
SFX 349 0 an .
SFX 349 0 ekin .
SFX 349 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 349 0 en .
SFX 349 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 349 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 349 0 k .
SFX 349 0 ko .
SFX 349 0 koa .
SFX 349 0 koak .
SFX 349 0 koa/1,377 .
SFX 349 0 ko/1,378 .
SFX 349 0 ra .
SFX 349 0 raino .
SFX 349 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 349 0 rantz .
SFX 349 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 349 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 349 0 rat .
SFX 349 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 349 0 rendako .
SFX 349 0 rentzat .
SFX 349 0 rentza/1,370 .
SFX 349 0 ri .
SFX 349 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 349 0 taz .
SFX 349 0 ta/1,375 .
SFX 349 0 tik .
SFX 349 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 349 0 tzat .
SFX 349 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 349 0 z .
SFX 349 0 z/1,370 .
