packages/hunspell-reader/dictionaries/eu/eu.dic
absorbi/1002,17,1
afrika/1002,2,1
ahopil/1002,7,1
akas/1002,107,1
aldizka/1002,114,1
amets/1002,109,1
anuntzia/1002,2,1
ardatz/1002,109,1
arrada/1002
arrunt/1002
astirotu/1002,17,1
atzeraraz/1002,113,1
aurtiki/1002,161,1
azorria/1002,2,1
balaka/1002,2,1
barna/1002,2,1
ba/1002
bekizkigu/1001,1000
beltzuri/1002,17,1
beramakiate/1001,1000
berralda/1002,2,1
besapera/1002,3,1
betza/1001,1000
bihurdika/1002,2,1
birjabe/1002,17,1
bizkorr/1002,131,1
bulgariza/1002,2,1
dabilzkik/1001,1000,228,1
dakarkiok/1001,1000,228,1
dakik/1001,1000,228,1
darabilkied/1001,1000,226,1
darakuskigu/1001,1000,227,1
daramazkiguzu/1001,1000,227,1
datozkid/1001,1000,226,1
defendi/1002,17,1
degiod/1001,1000,226,1
deritzozue/1001,1000,227,1
desakorda/1002,2,1
desespera/1002,3,1
deskoipezta/1002,2,1
desoinorde/1002,17,1
deunga/1002,2,1
didate/1001,1000,227,1
diezana/1001,1000,229,1
digua/1001,1000,225,1
dinake/1001,1000,224,1
diotsozak/1001,1000,228,1
dispertsa/1002,2,1
ditizketek/1001,1000
dizkied/1001,1000,226,1
dizkiona/1001,1000,225,1
doazkieee/1001,1000,229,1
durdi/1002,17,1
egos/1002,250,1
ekarzkien/1001,1000
elizkide/1002,17,1
enea/1002,2,1
eraginge/1002,17,1
erakutsak/1001,1000
erdaltzale/1002,17,1
eroso/1002
erregelamenta/1002,2,1
erreskalda/1002,2,1
esadazue/1001,1000
esets/1002,126,1
esmel/1002,7,1
estona/1002,2,1
ezarr/1002,156,1
fanatiza/1002,2,1
fornika/1002,2,1
gainera/1002
gaitua/1001,1000,225,1
galan/1002,107,1
garrapiña/1002,2,1
gatozan/1001,1000
gelifika/1002,2,1
genbilzkinakeen/1001,1000,233,1
genekarkio/1001,1000,225,1
generabilkio/1001,1000,225,1
generamazkiokee/1001,1000,225,1
gengozkina/1001,1000,225,1
genihardukikee/1001,1000,225,1
geniotsuze/1001,1000,225,1
genizkizue/1001,1000,225,1
gentxezkien/1001,1000,233,1
ginderabiltzake/1001,1000,224,1
gindezaguzna/1001,1000,227,1
gintuzkea/1001,1000,225,1
gintzakee/1001,1000,225,1
gizen/1002,7,1
gonberti/1002,17,1
gramatikaliza/1002,2,1
hagunda/1002,2,1
harpide/1002,17,1
hatorkit/1001,1000,228,1
hauskorr/1002,4,1
hekarkien/1001,1000,228,1
henkiokeen/1001,1000,233,1
heramakeen/1001,1000,233,1
herresta/1002,114,1
hiezadakee/1001,1000,225,1
hinderama/1001,1000,225,1
hindukete/1001,1000,227,1
hiotseke/1001,1000,224,1
hipnotiza/1002,2,1
hondarr/1002,4,1
husbete/1002,161,1
iezazkien/1001,1000
ihalozka/1002,114,1
ilusiona/1002,2,1
inhala/1002,2,1
intsonoriza/1002,2,1
irakatsazkiozu/1001,1000
irazgaitz/1002,109,1
itaila/1002,2,1
jardu/1002,143,1
kamufla/1002,2,1
kide/1002,17,1
konfigura/1002,3,1
kotara/1002,3,1
landerr/1002,4,1
lei/1002,17,1
lekarkizueke/1001,1000,224,1
leramakiakete/1001,1000,227,1
letxekinake/1001,1000,224,1
liezazkid/1001,1000,232,1
liotsekez/1001,1000,224,1
lizkidaketek/1001,1000
lotetsi/1002,6,1
maluta/1002,2,1
melentu/1002,17,1
molda/1002,2,1
muxakar/1002,5,1
nago/1001,1000,224,1
natorr/1001,1000,231,1
negia/1001,1000,225,1
nekarzkiekeen/1001,1000,233,1
nengokinakeen/1001,1000,233,1
nentxekina/1001,1000,225,1
nerakutsa/1001,1000,225,1
neroakee/1001,1000,225,1
niezazkizuekee/1001,1000,225,1
ninderabiltean/1001,1000
nindiketean/1001,1000
nindunan/1001,1000,233,1
nintzatekee/1001,1000,225,1
niraue/1001,1000,225,1
nizkizu/1001,1000,225,1
odolezta/1002,2,1
onkai/1002,17,1
paira/1002,3,1
pilaka/1002
prentsa/1002,2,1
sala/1002,2,1
sila/1002,2,1
superpopula/1002,2,1
tontorr/1002,4,1
txanbihur/1002,5,1
ugari/1002,340,1
uhandi/1002,17,1
ukan/1002,341,1
uka/1002,342,1
uler/1002,343,1
ur/1002,343,1
uzkur/1002,5,1
volapük/344,1
volapü/345,1
xoin/346,1
zabilzken/1001,1000
zaiek/1001,1000
zaitez/1001,1000,347,1
zakizkidake/1001,1000,224,1
zaparrasta/1002,2,1
zaroatzan/1001,1000
zebilkiokean/1001,1000
zegizkigu/1001,1000,225,1
zekarkioat/1001,1000
zekizkitenan/1001,1000
zenbait/348,1
zenekarzkie/1001,1000,225,1
zeneramazkigukete/1001,1000,227,1
zeniguketen/1001,1000,233,1
zenizkiokee/1001,1000,225,1
zerabilkiguketen/1001,1000,233,1
zeramakioat/1001,1000
zerbaitxo/349,1
zeritzaagu/1001,1000
zerraizkinakeen/1001,1000,233,1
zetazta/1002,2,1
zeukanat/1001,1000
zieketenan/1001,1000
zihardukeen/1001,1000,233,1
zindekusten/1001,1000,233,1
zinduzkate/1001,1000,227,1
zioskuketeze/1001,1000,225,1
ziraunat/1001,1000
zitzaizkizue/1001,1000,225,1
zizela/1002,2,1
zizkionan/1001,1000
zonbait/348,1
zonbeit/348,1
zuztarr/1002,4,1
